Massachusetts, session 194th, H1763.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 1 of Chapter 151B, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended
by adding the following new definition: “24. The term ‘Antisemitism’ shall have the same
meaning that is endorsed by the International Holocaust Remembrance Alliance, which shall
mean a certain perception of Jews, which may be expressed as hatred toward Jews. Rhetorical
and physical manifestations of antisemitism are directed toward Jewish or non-Jewish
individuals and/or their property, toward Jewish community institutions and religious facilities.”
of 1